Hawaii statutes.
§286-137 District courts to keep records.
The district court of each circuit shall keep, maintain, and control or shall
otherwise provide for the keeping, maintaining, and controlling of proper and
accurate records of each conviction or bail forfeiture or any other disposition
of each violation of licensee coming within this part. The district court of
each circuit shall also establish procedures for the accounting, control, and
disposition of each traffic citation, notice, or summons used or issued, whether
the use or issuance of the same is authorized by the court or by any other
governmental agency under applicable laws or ordinances, which may include the
keeping of an accurate citation, notice, or summons control ledger or form in a
numerical, chronological, or other accountable manner. [L 1961, c 113, pt of
§1; Supp, §160-71; HRS §286-137; am L 1970, c 188, §39; am L 1997, c 153, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next